Louisiana, session 2026, SB115.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:212(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§212. Agreements with federal government
* * *
E. The department may enter into any agreements with the federal
government or with any federal agency, including memoranda of
understanding, to assume responsibility of the United States Department of
Transportation, pursuant to 23 U.S.C. 326 and 327 as authorized under the
federal Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act, the federal Safe,
Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users,
and the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969.
(1) State sovereign immunity under the Eleventh Amendment of the
United States Constitution is waived for lawsuits in federal court, but only as
required by 23 U.S.C. 326 and 327. This waiver is limited solely to the
compliance, discharge, or enforcement of responsibilities assumed by the
department under these agreements and does not create any liability beyond
federal law requirements.
(2) The department may adopt and promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to implement an agreement pursuant to this Subsection and to carry
out any duties imposed by the agreement.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 115 ENROLLED
(3) The department may accept and make expenditures of money
received from the federal government or any agency of the federal government
for any transportation purpose.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.